apertium-lvs.lvs.dix
    <pardef n="sē/dēt__vblex" c="III (iv) -dēt">
      <e>       <p><l>dēt</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>žot</l>       <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>dot</l>       <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dam</l>       <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
 
      <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="skrien/ošs__pprs_act"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ž</l>         <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="skrien/ošs__pprs_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēj</l>         <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="cēl/is__pp_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dē</l>          <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="mez/dams__pprs_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dam</l>       <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="zogam/s__pprs_psv"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žam</l>       <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="zogam/s__pprs_psv"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēt</l>         <r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lēkt/s__pp_psv"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>žu</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>žam</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>di</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>žat</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ž</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ž</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>dēju</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dējām</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēji</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dējāt</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēja</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēja</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e>       <p><l>dēšu</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēsim</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēsi</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēsit</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēsiet</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēs</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>dēs</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e>       <p><l>di</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="TD"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>diet</l><r>dēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="TD"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>


    <pardef n="nā/kt__vblex" c="I (iv) -kt">
      <e><p>          <l>kt</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
 
      <e>       <p><l>k</l>         <r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="skrien/ošs__pprs_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="cēl/is__pp_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>k</l>          <r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="mez/dams__pprs_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>kam</l>       <r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="zogam/s__pprs_psv"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>kt</l>         <r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lēkt/s__pp_psv"/></e>

      <e><p>          <l>kšu</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ksim</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ksi</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ksiet</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ksit</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ks</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ks</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>cu</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cām</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ci</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cāt</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ca</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ca</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kam</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>c</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kat</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>k</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>k</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>c</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ciet</l><r>kt<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="nākt"><par n="ne"/><i>nā</i><par n="nā/kt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sēdēt"><par n="ne"/><i>sē</i><par n="sē/dēt__vblex"/></e>
